Utah statutes.
23-19-4.   Alien's and nonresident peace officer's right to licenses and
certificates.
(1)  An alien resident of the State of Utah may purchase hunting, fishing,
trapping, seining, and fur dealer licenses and certificates of registration
upon the same terms as a resident citizen.
(2)  All nonresident aliens may purchase hunting, fishing, trapping, seining,
and fur dealer licenses and certificates of registration upon the same terms
as nonresident citizens.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection 23-19-5(1)(b), a nonresident may purchase a
hunting, fishing, trapping, seining, and fur dealer license and certificate of
registration upon the same terms as a resident citizen if the person is:
(a)  employed by the state as a peace officer, as classified by Title 53,
Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications; and
(b)  required to live outside the state as a condition of the person's
employment.
